Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB889.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 702 of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 702. Duties of department.The department shall have the power and its duty shall be:* * *(13) To contact veterans whose names appear on the list transmitted to the department under 61 Pa.C.S. § 1105(a)(3)(relating to powers and duties of department) and encourage the veterans' voter registration.Section 2. Section 1712(6) and (7) of Title 51 are amended 123456789101112131415161718192021 and the section is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1712. Specific duties.In addition to such other duties as may be provided by law or as assigned by the Adjutant General, the Deputy Adjutant General for Veterans' Affairs shall have the following specific duties:* * *(6) To aid in the rehabilitation of injured, wounded or compensable veterans in educational institutions or [vocational training] career and technical training institutions for which they may be eligible by law.(7) To cooperate with and advise the Department of Education with respect to [vocational] career and technical training programs for veterans, particularly programs suited to casualties.* * *(17) To encourage voter registration among veterans.Section 3. Section 1105(a) of Title 61 is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1105. Powers and duties of department.(a) General rule.--The department shall have the power and its duty shall be:* * *(3) To maintain a list of individuals who are both veterans and committed to a term of imprisonment or otherwise confined under the custody of the Commonwealth and to transmit the individuals' names and addresses, not less than 30 days prior to the individuals' release or discharge from confinement, to each county director of veterans affairs.* * *20250HB0889PN0929 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "veteran" means the same as in 51 Pa.C.S. § 7101.2 (relating to definitions).Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0889PN0929 - 3 - 1234